Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2938
Quorum.

Unless the articles of organization or bylaws provide otherwise, ten percent, but not less than five nor more than fifty of the members, need to be present at an annual or special members' meeting to constitute a quorum.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 38.